Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 78. Individuals with Traumatic Brain Injury (Tbi)

§ 7801.
Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund.

The Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund is established in the Office of the State Treasurer as a special fund to be a source of financing for services for individuals with TBI and for programs established by or through contracts with the Agency of Human Services for the treatment of traumatic brain injuries.

Into the Fund shall be deposited proceeds from grants, donations, contributions, taxes, and any other sources of revenue as may be provided by statute, rule, or act of the General Assembly.

The Fund shall be administered pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, except that interest earned on the Fund and any remaining balance shall be retained in the Fund.

All monies received by or generated to the Fund shall be used only as allowed by appropriation of the General Assembly for the administration and delivery of services for individuals with TBI and for programs for the treatment of brain injuries established by or through contracts with the Agency of Human Services.

The Agency of Human Services shall develop a policy for disbursement of monies from the Fund created in subsection (a) of this section and submit the policy to the Joint Fiscal Committee for approval at its September 2008 meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 9a.